Utah statutes.
64-13-30.5.   Payment by inmate for postsecondary educational tuition.

(1) (a)  An inmate participating in a postsecondary education program through the department shall pay to the department at the time of enrollment 50% of the costs of the postsecondary education tuition.

(b)  If an inmate desires to participate in the postsecondary education program but is unable to pay the costs of the education because of inadequate financial resources, the inmate may participate in a deferred tuition payment program under this section.

(c)  The department and the Office of State Debt Collection shall coordinate a deferred postsecondary education tuition repayment program to provide inmates a reasonable payment schedule and payment amount to allow for deferred payment of the postsecondary educational tuition obligation the inmate incurred while under supervision of the department, which shall:

(i)  account for all postsecondary education tuition costs incurred by the inmate while under the supervision of the department;

(ii)  establish an appropriate time for the inmate to begin payment of postsecondary education tuition costs, which shall require that payments start no later than two years after termination of parole; and

(iii)  establish a payment schedule and payment amounts, including prevailing interest rates, commensurate with student loans currently being offered by local financial institutions.

(d)  Neither the department nor the Office of State Debt Collection may relieve an offender of the postsecondary tuition repayment responsibility.

(e)  The department shall pay costs of postsecondary education not paid by the offender at the time of participation in the program from the Prison Telephone Surcharge Account.

(2) (a)  Of those tuition funds collected by the Office of State Debt Collection under this section, 10% may be used by the Office of State Debt Collection for operation of the deferred payment program.

(b)  All other funds collected as repayment for postsecondary tuition costs shall be deposited in the Prison Telephone Surcharge Account.

(3)  Only inmates lawfully present in the United States may participate in the postsecondary educational program offered through the department.



Enacted by Chapter 258, 2009 General Session

